Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Governor’s Office for Coal and Energy Policy

11.300.
Governor’s Office for Coal and Energy Policy created. [Repealed.]

11.305.
Responsibilities of Governor’s Office for Coal and Energy Policy. [Repealed.]

11.310.
Research program. [Repealed.]

11.315.
Duties of Governor’s Office for Coal and Energy Policy. [Repealed.]

11.320.
Administration of state and federally funded programs. [Repealed.]

11.325.
Administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

11.330.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

11.335.
Establishment of research program. [Repealed.]

11.340.
Duties of special assistant. [Repealed.]

11.345.
Powers of special assistant. [Repealed.]

11.350.
Study grants. [Repealed.]

11.355.
Interstate agreements. [Repealed.]

11.360.
Extension of program into state schools. [Repealed.]